Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-606.01
Candidate filing form; special election; filing period; requirements.

(1) Except as provided in section 32-564, any candidate in a special election to fill a vacancy for an office of a political subdivision may have his or her name placed on the special election ballot by filing a candidate filing form prescribed by the Secretary of State as provided in section 32-607 and this section. The filing period for filing the candidate filing form shall be:

(a) On or before March 1 for a special election to be held in conjunction with the statewide primary election;

(b) On or before August 1 for a special election to be held in conjunction with the statewide general election; and

(c) Between the eighth Friday prior to the election and the fifth Friday prior to the election for all other elections.

(2) A candidate filing form for such special election shall meet the requirements of section 32-607, except that the form shall contain the following statement: "I hereby swear that I will abide by the laws of the State of Nebraska regarding the results of the special election, that I am a registered voter and qualified to be elected, and that I will serve if elected.".

(3) A candidate filing form for such special election shall be filed with the filing officer specified in subsection (2) of section 32-607.

Laws 2024, LB287, § 26.